waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX T ti      siantiems       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančius        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiais       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiuose      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      ią              [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iantys          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančių          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iantiems        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančius         [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiais        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiuose       [sš]ti
SFX T zti     sią             zti
SFX T zti     siantys         zti
SFX T zti     siančių         zti
SFX T zti     siantiems       zti
SFX T zti     siančius        zti
SFX T zti     siančiais       zti
SFX T zti     siančiuose      zti
SFX T žti     šią             žti
SFX T žti     šiantys         žti
SFX T žti     šiančių         žti
SFX T žti     šiantiems       žti
SFX T žti     šiančius        žti
SFX T žti     šiančiais       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiuose      žti
SFX T ti      siančioms       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančias        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiomis      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiose       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      iančioms        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančias         [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiomis       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiose        [sš]ti
SFX T zti     siančioms       zti
SFX T zti     siančias        zti
SFX T zti     siančiomis      zti
SFX T zti     siančiose       zti
SFX T žti     šiančioms       žti
SFX T žti     šiančias        žti
SFX T žti     šiančiomis      žti
SFX T žti     šiančiose       žti
SFX T ti      siantysis       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiojo       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiajam      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siantįjį        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiuoju      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiajame     [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      iantysis        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiojo        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiajam       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iantįjį         [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiuoju       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiajame      [sš]ti
SFX T zti     siantysis       zti
SFX T zti     siančiojo       zti
SFX T zti     siančiajam      zti
SFX T zti     siantįjį        zti
SFX T zti     siančiuoju      zti
SFX T zti     siančiajame     zti
SFX T žti     šiantysis       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiojo       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiajam      žti
SFX T žti     šiantįjį        žti
SFX T žti     šiančiuoju      žti
SFX T žti     šiančiajame     žti
SFX T ti      siančioji       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiosios     [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiajai      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiąją       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiąja       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiojoje     [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiojoj      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      iančioji        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiosios      [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiajai       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiąją        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiąja        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiojoje      [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiojoj       [sš]ti
SFX T zti     siančioji       zti
SFX T zti     siančiosios     zti
SFX T zti     siančiajai      zti
SFX T zti     siančiąją       zti
SFX T zti     siančiąja       zti
SFX T zti     siančiojoje     zti
SFX T zti     siančiojoj      zti
SFX T žti     šiančioji       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiosios     žti
SFX T žti     šiančiajai      žti
SFX T žti     šiančiąją       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiąja       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiojoje     žti
SFX T žti     šiančiojoj      žti
SFX T ti      siantieji       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiųjų       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siantiesiems    [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiuosius    [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiaisiais   [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiuosiuose  [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      iantieji        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiųjų        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iantiesiems     [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiuosius     [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiaisiais    [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiuosiuose   [sš]ti
SFX T zti     siantieji       zti
SFX T zti     siančiųjų       zti
SFX T zti     siantiesiems    zti
SFX T zti     siančiuosius    zti
SFX T zti     siančiaisiais   zti
SFX T zti     siančiuosiuose  zti
SFX T žti     šiantieji       žti
SFX T žti     šiančiųjų       žti
SFX T žti     šiantiesiems    žti
SFX T žti     šiančiuosius    žti
SFX T žti     šiančiaisiais   žti
SFX T žti     šiančiuosiuose  žti
SFX T ti      siančiosioms    [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiąsias     [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiosiomis   [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      siančiosiose    [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      iančiosioms     [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiąsias      [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiosiomis    [sš]ti
SFX T ti      iančiosiose     [sš]ti
SFX T zti     siančiosioms    zti
SFX T zti     siančiąsias     zti
SFX T zti     siančiosiomis   zti
SFX T zti     siančiosiose    zti
SFX T žti     šiančiosioms    žti
SFX T žti     šiančiąsias     žti
SFX T žti     šiančiosiomis   žti
SFX T žti     šiančiosiose    žti
SFX T ti      simas           [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simo            [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simam           [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simą            [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simu            [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simame          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imas            [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imo             [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imam            [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imą             [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imu             [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imame           [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simas           zti
SFX T zti     simo            zti
SFX T zti     simam           zti
SFX T zti     simą            zti
SFX T zti     simu            zti
SFX T zti     simame          zti
SFX T žti     šimas           žti
SFX T žti     šimo            žti
SFX T žti     šimam           žti
SFX T žti     šimą            žti
SFX T žti     šimu            žti
SFX T žti     šimame          žti
SFX T ti      sima            [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simos           [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simai           [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simoje          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simoj           [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      ima             [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imos            [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imai            [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imoje           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imoj            [sš]ti
SFX T zti     sima            zti
SFX T zti     simos           zti
SFX T zti     simai           zti
SFX T zti     simoje          zti
SFX T zti     simoj           zti
SFX T žti     šima            žti
SFX T žti     šimos           žti
SFX T žti     šimai           žti
SFX T žti     šimoje          žti
SFX T žti     šimoj           žti
SFX T ti      simi            [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simų            [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simiems         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simus           [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simais          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simuose         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imi             [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imų             [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imiems          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imus            [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imais           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imuose          [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simi            zti
SFX T zti     simų            zti
SFX T zti     simiems         zti
SFX T zti     simus           zti
SFX T zti     simais          zti
SFX T zti     simuose         zti
SFX T žti     šimi            žti
SFX T žti     šimų            žti
SFX T žti     šimiems         žti
SFX T žti     šimus           žti
SFX T žti     šimais          žti
SFX T žti     šimuose         žti
SFX T ti      simoms          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simomis         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simose          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imoms           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imomis          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imose           [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simoms          zti
SFX T zti     simomis         zti
SFX T zti     simose          zti
SFX T žti     šimoms          žti
SFX T žti     šimomis         žti
SFX T žti     šimose          žti
SFX T ti      simasis         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simojo          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simajam         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simąjį          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simuoju         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simajame        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imasis          [sš]ti
